North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE IV JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT

Original Article IV of the constitution (consisting of sections 85 through 120) was repealed and a new Article IV (consisting of sections 85 through 97) was created by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 599).

See Article VI of the renumbered constitution.

Section 85.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The judicial power of the State of North Dakota shall be vested in a supreme court, district courts, county courts, justices of the peace, and in such other courts as may be created by law for cities, incorporated towns and villages.

Section 86.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The supreme court, except as otherwise provided in this Constitution, shall have appellate jurisdiction only, which shall be co-extensive with the state and shall have a general superintending control over all inferior courts under such regulations and
limitations as may be prescribed by law.

Section 87.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

It shall have power to issue writs of habeas corpus, mandamus, quo warranto, certiorari, injunction and such other original and remedial writs as may be necessary to the proper exercise of its jurisdiction, and shall have authority to hear and determine
the same; provided, however, that no jury trial shall be allowed in said supreme court, but in proper cases questions of fact may be sent by said court to a district court for trial.

Section 88.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Until otherwise provided by law three terms of the supreme court shall be held each year, one at the seat of government, one at Fargo, in the county of Cass, and one at Grand Forks, in the county of Grand Forks.

Section 89.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as amended by art. amd. 25, approved November 5, 1918 (S.L. 1915, ch. 86; 1917, ch. 93) read:

The Supreme Court shall consist of five judges, a majority of whom shall be necessary to form a quorum or pronounce a decision, but one or more of said judges may adjourn the court from day to day or to a day certain, provided, however, that in no case
shall any legislative enactment or law of the state of North Dakota be declared unconstitutional unless at least four of the judges shall so decide.

The section as amended by art. amd. 10, approved November 3, 1908 (S.L. 1905, p. 351; 1907, p. 458) read:

The supreme court shall consist of five judges, a majority of whom shall be necessary to form a quorum or pronounce a decision, but one or more of said judges may adjourn the court from day to day or to a day certain.

The section as originally adopted read:

The supreme court shall consist of three judges, a majority of whom shall be necessary to form a quorum or pronounce a decision, but one or more of said judges may adjourn the court from day to day or to a day certain.

Section 90.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599).

Article 46 of the amendments to the constitution, amended and reenacted sections 90, 91, and 99 of the constitution and incorporated the three sections into one section, designated as section 90. Sections 91 and 99 thus were indirectly repealed.

The section as amended by art. amd. 46, approved June 25, 1930 (S.L. 1929, ch. 98; 1931, p. 578) read:

The judges of the supreme court shall be elected by the qualified electors of the state at general elections. The term of office shall be ten years and the judges shall hold their offices until their successors are duly qualified and shall receive such
compensation for their services as may be prescribed by law. Provided that this section shall not be applicable to the terms of office of judges of the supreme court elected prior to the general election of the year 1934, at which
election three supreme court judges shall be chosen; and the candidate at said election receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of ten years, the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes shall
be elected for a term of eight years and the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of six years.

The section as originally adopted read:

The judges of the supreme court shall be elected by the qualified electors of the state at large, and except as may be otherwise provided herein for the first election for judges under this Constitution, said judges shall be elected at general elections.

Section 91.

This section as originally adopted was indirectly repealed by art. amd. 46 which amended and reenacted sections 90, 91, and 99 of the constitution and incorporated the three sections into one section designated as section 90. A new provision designated
as section 91 was adopted in 1976 by art. amd. 97. (See Article VI, § 7 of the renumbered constitution.)

The section as originally adopted read:

The term of office of the judges of the supreme court, except as in this article otherwise provided, shall be six years, and they shall hold their offices until their successors are duly qualified.

Section 92.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The judges of the supreme court shall, immediately after the first election under this Constitution, be classified by lot so that one shall hold his office for the term of three years, one for the term of five years, and one for the term of seven years
from the first Monday in December, a.d., 1889. The lots shall be drawn by the judges, who shall for that purpose assemble at the seat of government, and they shall cause the result thereof to be certified to the Secretary of the Territory
and filed in his office, unless the Secretary of State of North Dakota shall have entered upon the duties of his office, in which event said certification shall be filed therein. The judge having the shortest term to serve, not holding
his office by election or appointment to fill a vacancy, shall be chief justice and shall preside at all terms of the supreme court and in case of his absence the judge having in like manner the next shortest term to serve shall preside
in his stead.

Section 93.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

There shall be a clerk and also a reporter of the supreme court, who shall be appointed by the judges thereof, and who shall hold their offices during the pleasure of said judges, and whose duties and emoluments shall be prescribed by law and by rules
of the supreme court not inconsistent with law. The Legislative Assembly shall make provision for the publication and distribution of the decisions of the supreme court and for the sale of the published volumes thereof.

Section 94.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

No person shall be eligible to the office of judge of the supreme court unless he be learned in the law, be at least thirty years of age and a citizen of the United States, nor unless he shall have resided in this state or the Territory of Dakota three
years next preceding his election.

Section 95.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Whenever the population of the State of North Dakota shall equal 600,000 the Legislative Assembly shall have the power to increase the number of judges of the supreme court to five, in which event a majority of said court, as thus increased, shall constitute
a quorum.

Section 96.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

No duties shall be imposed by law upon the supreme court or any of the judges thereof, except such as are judicial, nor shall any of the judges thereof exercise any power of appointment except as herein provided.

Section 97.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The style of all process shall be “The State of North Dakota.” All prosecutions shall be carried on in the name and by the authority of the State of North Dakota and conclude “against the peace and dignity of the State of North Dakota.”

Section 98.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Any vacancy happening by death, resignation or otherwise in the office of judge of the supreme court shall be filled by appointment, by the Governor, which appointment shall continue until the first general election thereafter, when said vacancy shall
be filled by election.

Section 99.

This section was indirectly repealed by art. amd. 46 which amended and reenacted sections 90, 91, and 99 of the constitution and incorporated the three sections into one section designated as section 90. The section as originally adopted read:

The judges of the supreme and district courts shall receive such compensation for their services as may be prescribed by law, which compensation shall not be increased or diminished during the term for which a judge shall have been elected.

Section 100.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

In case a judge of the supreme court shall be in any way interested in a cause brought before said court, the remaining judges of said court shall call one of the district judges to sit with them on the hearing of said cause.

Section 101.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

When a judgment or decree is reversed or confirmed by the supreme court every point fairly arising upon the record of the case shall be considered and decided, and the reasons therefor shall be concisely stated in writing, signed by the judges concurring,
filed in the office of the clerk of the supreme court and preserved with a record of the case. Any judge dissenting therefrom may give the reasons of his dissent in writing over his signature.

Section 102.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

It shall be the duty of the court to prepare a syllabus of the points adjudicated in each case, which shall be concurred in by a majority of the judges thereof, and it shall be prefixed to the published reports of the case.

DISTRICT COURTS

Section 103.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The district courts shall have original jurisdiction, except as otherwise provided in this Constitution, of all causes both at law and equity, and such appellate jurisdiction as may be conferred by law. They and the judges thereof shall also have jurisdiction
and power to issue writs of habeas corpus, quo warranto, certiorari, injunction and other original and remedial writs, with authority to hear and determine the same.

Section 104.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as amended by art. amd. 45, approved June 25, 1930 (S.L. 1929, ch. 97; 1931, p. 578) read:

The state shall be divided into not less than six judicial districts, in each of which there shall be elected at general elections by the electors thereof one or more judges of the district court therein as may be provided by law. The term of office of
a judge of the district court hereafter elected shall be six years from the first Monday in January succeeding his election and he shall hold his office until his successor is duly qualified. At the general election in 1932 there shall
be elected as many judges as there are judgeships to be filled in each judicial district; the candidate receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to a term of six years, the candidate receiving the next highest number
of votes shall be elected to a term of four years, and in case three judges are to be elected, the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to a term of two years, and thereafter each judge shall be elected
to a term of six years.

The section as originally adopted read:

The state shall be divided into six Judicial Districts, in each of which there shall be elected at general elections, by the electors thereof, one judge of the district court therein, whose term of office shall be four years from the first Monday in January
succeeding his election and until his successor is duly qualified. This section shall not be construed as governing the first election of district judges under this Constitution.

Section 105.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Until otherwise provided by law said districts shall be constituted as follows:

District No. One shall consist of the counties of Pembina, Cavalier, Walsh, Nelson and Grand Forks.

District No. Two shall consist of the counties of Ramsey, Towner, Benson, Pierce, Rolette, Bottineau, McHenry, Church, Renville, Ward, Stevens, Mountraille, Garfield, Flannery and Buford.

District No. Three shall consist of the counties of Cass, Steele and Traill.

District No. Four shall consist of the counties of Richland, Ransom, Sargent, Dickey and McIntosh.

District No. Five shall consist of the counties of Logan, LaMoure, Stutsman, Barnes, Wells, Foster, Eddy and Griggs.

District No. Six shall consist of the counties of Burleigh, Emmons, Kidder, Sheridan, McLean, Morton, Oliver, Mercer, Williams, Stark, Hettinger, Bowman, Billings, McKenzie, Dunn, Wallace and Allred, and that portion of the Sioux Indian Reservation lying
north of the Seventh Standard Parallel.

Section 106.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The Legislative Assembly may whenever two-thirds of the members of each house shall concur therein, but not oftener than once in four years, increase the number of said judicial districts and the judges thereof; such districts shall be formed from compact
territory and bounded by county lines, but such increase or change in the boundaries of the districts shall not work the removal of any judge from his office during the term for which he may have been elected or appointed.

Section 107.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

No person shall be eligible to the office of district judge, unless he be learned in the law, be at least twenty-five years of age, and a citizen of the United States, nor unless he shall have resided within the State or Territory of Dakota at least two
years next preceding his election, nor unless he shall at the time of his election be an elector within the judicial district for which he is elected.

Section 108.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

There shall be a Clerk of the District Court in each organized county in which a court is holden who shall be elected by the qualified electors of the county, and shall hold his office for the same term as other county officers. He shall receive such
compensation for his services as may be prescribed by law.

Section 109.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Writs of error and appeals may be allowed from the decisions of the district courts to the Supreme Court under such regulations as may be prescribed by law.

COUNTY COURTS

Section 110.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

There shall be established in each county a county court, which shall be a court of record open at all times and holden by one judge, elected by the electors of the county, and whose term of office shall be two years.

Section 111.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The County Court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction in probate and testamentary matters, the appointment of administrators and guardians, the settlement of the accounts of executors, administrators and guardians, the sale of lands by executors,
administrators and guardians, and such other probate jurisdiction as may be conferred by law; provided that whenever the voters of any county having a population of two thousand or over shall decide by a majority vote that they desire
the jurisdiction of said court increased above that limited by this Constitution, then said County Court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the District Courts in all civil actions where the amount in controversy does not exceed
one thousand dollars, and in all criminal actions below the grade of felony, and in case it is decided by the voters of any county to so increase the jurisdiction of said County Court, the jurisdiction in cases of misdemeanors arising
under state laws which may have been conferred upon police magistrates, shall cease. The qualifications of the judge of the County Court in counties where the jurisdiction of said court shall have been increased shall be the same as
those of the district judge, except that he shall be a resident of the county at the time of his election, and said county judge shall receive such salary for his services as may be provided by law. In case the voters of any county
decide to increase the jurisdiction of said County Courts, then such jurisdiction as thus increased shall remain until otherwise provided by law.

Partition.

Under this section an heir cannot sue in district court for partition of an estate after the county court has taken jurisdiction to administer the estate and before it has made a final decree of distribution. Honsinger v. Stewart, 34 N.D. 513, 159 N.W.
12, 1916 N.D. LEXIS 52 (N.D. 1916).

Section 112.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The Legislative Assembly shall provide by law for the election of justices of the peace in each organized county within the state. But the number of said justices to be elected in each organized county shall be limited by law to such a number as shall
be necessary for the proper administration of justice. The justices of the peace herein provided for shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in all civil actions when the amount in controversy, exclusive of costs,
does not exceed two hundred dollars, and in counties where no county court with criminal jurisdiction exists they shall have such jurisdiction to hear and determine cases of misdemeanor as may be provided by law, but in no case shall
said justices of the peace have jurisdiction when the boundaries of or title to real estate shall come in question. The Legislative Assembly shall have power to abolish the office of justice of the peace and confer that jurisdiction
upon judges of County Courts, or elsewhere.

Section 113.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The Legislative Assembly shall provide by law for the election of police magistrates in cities, incorporated towns, and villages, who in addition to their jurisdiction of all cases arising under the ordinances of said cities, towns and villages, shall
be ex officio justices of the peace of the county in which said cities, towns and villages may be located. And the Legislative Assembly may confer upon said police magistrates the jurisdiction to hear, try and determine all cases of
misdemeanors, and the prosecutions therein shall be by information.

Section 114.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Appeals shall lie from the County Court, final decisions of justices of the peace and police magistrates in such cases and pursuant to such regulations as may be prescribed by law.

Section 115.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

The time of holding courts in the several counties of a district shall be as prescribed by law, but at least two terms of the district court shall be held annually in each organized county, and the Legislative Assembly shall make provisions for attaching
unorganized counties or territories to organized counties for judicial purposes.

Section 116.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Judges of the district courts may hold court in other districts than their own under such regulations as shall be prescribed by law.

Section 117.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

No judge of the Supreme or District Court shall act as attorney or counselor at law.

Section 118.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Until the Legislative Assembly shall provide by law for fixing the terms of court, the judges of the Supreme and District Courts shall fix the terms thereof.

Section 119.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

No judge of the Supreme or District Courts shall be elected or appointed to any other than judicial offices or be eligible thereto during the term for which he was elected or appointed such judge. All votes or appointments for either of them for any elective
or appointive office except that of judge of the Supreme Court or District Court, given by the Legislative Assembly or the people, shall be void.

Section 120.

Repealed by art. amd. 97, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 615, § 2; 1977, ch. 599). The section as originally adopted read:

Tribunals of conciliation may be established with such powers and duties as shall be prescribed by law, or the powers and duties of such may be conferred upon other courts of justice; but such tribunals or other courts when sitting as such, shall have
no power to render judgment to be obligatory on the parties, unless they voluntarily submit their matters of difference and agree to abide the judgment of such tribunals or courts.